Utah, session 2026, SB137.
Section 1. Section 35A-16-204 is amended to read:35A-16-204. Utah Homeless Services Board.(1)There is created within the office the Utah Homeless Services Board.(2)(a)The board shall consist of the following members:(i)a representative, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;(ii)a representative, appointed by the president of the Senate;(iii)a private sector representative, appointed by the governor;(iv)a representative, appointed by the governor;(v)a statewide philanthropic leader, appointed by the Utah Impact Partnership or the partnership's successor organization;(vi)the mayor of Salt Lake City;(vii)the chief executive officer appointed by the Shelter Cities Advisory Council in accordance with Section 35A-16-210;(viii)an individual with lived experience of homelessness, appointed by the chair of the board;(ix)a representative, appointed by the Utah Association of Counties or the association's successor organization;(x)an individual who represents the Utah Homeless Network; (xi)a representative with expertise in physical or mental health care, appointed by the University of Utah Health;(xii)a representative with expertise in physical or mental health care, appointed by the largest non-profit hospital system with multiple hospitals in Utah; and(xi)(xiii)the coordinator.(b)The board members appointed under Subsections (2)(a)(xi) and (2)(a)(xii) may not be appointed to represent the same field of health care, except that either member who is qualified may be appointed to represent both fields of health care.(b)(c)The governor shall select a board member to serve as chair of the board.(3)The following four members of the board shall serve as the executive committee:(a)the coordinator; and(b)three board members chosen by the board chair, which shall include one of the members described in Subsection (2)(a)(vi) or (2)(a)(vii).(4)(a)The board shall meet at least once per calendar quarter.(b)The chair, the coordinator, or three of the board members may call a board meeting.(c)The individual calling the meeting shall provide notice of the meeting to the board members at least three calendar days in advance of the meeting.(5)A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum of the board at any meeting, and the action of the majority of voting members present constitutes the action of the board.(6)(a)A majority of members of the executive committee constitutes a quorum of the executive committee at any meeting, and the action of the majority of members present constitutes the action of the executive committee.(b)The executive committee is exempt from the requirements described in Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(7)(a)Except as required by Subsection (7)(c):(i)each appointed member of the board, other than a board member described in Subsection (2)(a)(vii), shall serve a four-year term; and(ii)the board member appointed in accordance with Subsection (2)(a)(vii) shall serve a two-year term.(b)A board member may serve more than one term.(c)The appointing authority, at the time of appointment or reappointment, may adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the appointed board members are appointed every two years.(8)When a vacancy occurs in the appointed membership for any reason, the replacement is appointed for the unexpired term.(9)(a)Except as described in Subsection (9)(b), a member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(i)Section 63A-3-106;(ii)Section 63A-3-107; and(iii)rules made by the Division of Finance in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.(b)Compensation and expenses of a board member who is a legislator are governed by Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Legislative Compensation and Expenses.(10)The office shall provide staff and administrative support to the board.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.